Utah statutes.
72-7-107.   Public safety program signs -- Permits.
(1)  As used in this section, "public safety program sign" means a sign,
placed on or adjacent to a highway, that is promoting a highway safety program
or highway safety practice, or a crime or drug abuse prevention program that
is being sponsored by the department, the Department of Public Safety, or a
local law enforcement agency.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules to allow public safety program signs on
state highways by permit.  The rules shall contain reasonable terms and
conditions:
(a)  that are no more restrictive than motorist service signing requirements
of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways
adopted under Section 41-6a-301; and
(b)  for granting and maintaining a permit.
